Vermont, session 2025-2026, H257.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 2478 is added to read:
§ 2478. OFFICE OF ENTREPRENEURSHIP
(a) The Office of Entrepreneurship is created within the Agency of
Commerce and Community Development to promote the needs of
entrepreneurs in the State by:
(1) working to strengthen policies and programs supporting the growth
of entrepreneurship in the State across demographic segments and geographic
areas;
VT LEG #380210 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.257
2025 Page 2 of 3
(2) working with stakeholders and organizations supporting
entrepreneurship to enhance the learning and skills of, provide technical
support to, and expand access to resources for entrepreneurs across the State;
(3) serving as a point of contact to assist businesses that have been in
operation for not more than five years in interactions with State agencies and,
where appropriate, referring businesses to other State or local agencies that
provide assistance to businesses; and
(4) encouraging the award of at least five percent of the total number of
State contracts to businesses that have been in operation for not more than five
years and whose principal place of business is in this State.
(b) Beginning on March 1, 2027 and each year thereafter, the Office of
Entrepreneurship shall submit to the General Assembly a report that includes
the following information for the previous calendar year:
(1) the number and total dollar amount of State contracts awarded to
businesses that have been in operation for not more than five years, including a
breakdown by demographic segments and geographical areas throughout the
State;
(2) the percentage of State contracts awarded to businesses that have
been in operation for not more than five years compared to the total number of
contracts awarded;
VT LEG #380210 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.257
2025 Page 3 of 3
(3) the number of businesses owned by women, minorities, or veterans
that have been in operation for not more than five years and have been
awarded a State contract;
(4) the percentage of the total dollar amount of State contracts awarded
to businesses that have been in operation for not more than five years
compared to the total dollar amount of contracts awarded;
(5) recommendations on improving access to State contracts for
businesses that have been in operation for not more than five years, including
businesses in statistically underrepresented demographic segments and
geographic areas of Vermont;
(6) recommendations on improving overall entrepreneurship in this
State, including identifying regional challenges to entrepreneurship; and
(7) any additional information deemed necessary by the Agency of
Commerce and Community Development to provide an accurate depiction of
the conditions of entrepreneurship in Vermont.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380210 v.1